test/src/morphology/N-soll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sõll â-stem : # Noun 'embrace' - full paradigm
     sõll+N+Sg+Nom: sõll
     sõll+N+Sg+Gen: sõõl
     sõll+N+Sg+Acc: sõõl
     sõll+N+Sg+Ill: sõˊlle
     sõll+N+Sg+Loc: sõõlâst
     sõll+N+Sg+Com: sõõlin
     sõll+N+Ess: sõllân
     sõll+N+Par: sõllâd
     sõll+N+Sg+Abe: sõõltää
     sõll+N+Pl+Nom: sõõl
     sõll+N+Pl+Gen: sõõli
     sõll+N+Pl+Acc: sõõlid
     sõll+N+Pl+Ill: sõõlid
     sõll+N+Pl+Loc: sõõlin
     sõll+N+Pl+Com: sõõlivuiˊm
     sõll+N+Pl+Abe: sõõlitää
